Missouri, session 2026, HB3339.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 217.665, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 217.665, to read as follows:
217.665. 1. Beginning August 28, 1996, the parole board shall consist of seven
members appointed by the governor by and with the advice and consent of the senate.
2. Beginning August 28, 1996, members of the board shall be persons of recognized
integrity and honor, known to possess education and ability in decision making through career
experience and other qualifications for the successful performance of their official duties.
Not more than four members of the board shall be of the same political party.
3. At the expiration of the term of each member and of each succeeding member, the
governor shall appoint a successor who shall hold office for a term of six years and until his
successor has been appointed and qualified. Members may be appointed to succeed
themselves.
4. Vacancies occurring in the office of any member shall be filled by appointment by
the governor for the unexpired term.
5. The governor shall designate one member of the board as chair and one member as
vice chair. The chair shall establish the duties and responsibilities of the members of the
board and supervise their performance and may require reports from any member as to his or
her conduct and exercise of duties. In the event of the chair's removal, death, resignation, or
inability to serve, the vice chair shall act as chair upon written order of the governor or chair.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3339 2
6. Members of the board shall devote full time to the duties of their office and before
taking office shall subscribe to an oath or affirmation to support the Constitution of the United
States and the Constitution of the State of Missouri. The oath shall be signed in the office of
the secretary of state.
7. Beginning January 1, 2027, each member of the board shall be required to
conduct at least four in-person visits per year to any department of corrections facility.
8. The annual compensation for each member of the board whose term commenced
before August 28, 1999, shall be forty-five thousand dollars plus any salary adjustment,
including prior salary adjustments, provided pursuant to section 105.005. Salaries for board
members whose terms commence after August 27, 1999, shall be set as provided in section
105.950; provided, however, that the compensation of a board member shall not be increased
during the member's term of office, except as provided in section 105.005. In addition to
compensation provided by law, the members shall be entitled to reimbursement for necessary
travel and other expenses incurred pursuant to section 33.090.
[8.] 9. Any person who served as a member of the board of probation and parole prior
to July 1, 2000, shall be made, constituted, appointed and employed by the board of trustees
of the state employees' retirement system as a special consultant on the problems of
retirement, aging and other state matters. As compensation for such services, such consultant
shall not be denied use of any unused sick leave, or the ability to receive credit for unused
sick leave pursuant to chapter 104, provided such sick leave was maintained by the board of
probation and parole in the regular course of business prior to July 1, 2000, but only to the
extent of such sick leave records are consistent with the rules promulgated pursuant to section
36.350. Nothing in this section shall authorize the use of any other form of leave that may
have been maintained by the board prior to July 1, 2000.
✔